Wisconsin, session 2025, AB1203.
do enact as follows:AB1203,11Section 1. 1.12 (3) (d) of the statutes is created to read:AB1203,3,421.12 (3) (d) Net zero economy-wide. By 2050, the state shall achieve 100 3percent clean electricity production and emit no more carbon into the atmosphere 4than can be removed economy-wide.AB1203,25Section 2. 15.105 (35) of the statutes is created to read:AB1203,4,2615.105 (35) Office of sustainability and clean energy. There is created 1in the department of administration an office to be known as the office of 2sustainability and clean energy.AB1203,33Section 3. 16.75 (12) (a) 3. of the statutes is amended to read:AB1203,4,5416.75 (12) (a) 3. “Renewable “Carbon-free percentage” means the percentage 5of total annual electric energy that is derived from renewable carbon-free resources.AB1203,46Section 4. 16.75 (12) (a) 4. of the statutes is amended to read:AB1203,4,9716.75 (12) (a) 4. “Renewable “Carbon-free resource” has the meaning given for 8“carbon-free resource” in s. 196.378 (1) (h) 1. or 2. and includes a resource, as 9defined in s. 196.378 (1) (j), that derives electricity from hydroelectric power (ax).AB1203,510Section 5. 16.75 (12) (b) 1. of the statutes is amended to read:AB1203,4,131116.75 (12) (b) 1. That the renewable percentage, as defined in s. 16.75 (12) (a) 123., 2023 stats., for total annual electric energy by December 31, 2007, is at least 10 13percent.AB1203,614Section 6. 16.75 (12) (b) 2. of the statutes is amended to read:AB1203,4,171516.75 (12) (b) 2. That the renewable percentage, as defined in s. 16.75 (12) (a) 163., 2023 stats., for total annual electric energy by December 31, 2011, is at least 20 17percent.AB1203,718Section 7. 16.75 (12) (b) 3. of the statutes is created to read:AB1203,4,201916.75 (12) (b) 3. That the carbon-free percentage for total annual electric 20energy by January 1, 2030, is at least 50 percent.AB1203,821Section 8. 16.75 (12) (b) 4. of the statutes is created to read:AB1203,4,232216.75 (12) (b) 4. That the carbon-free percentage for total annual electric 23energy by January 1, 2035, is at least 65 percent.AB1203,924Section 9. 16.75 (12) (b) 5. of the statutes is created to read:AB1203,5,2116.75 (12) (b) 5. That the carbon-free percentage for total annual electric 2energy by January 1, 2040, is at least 80 percent.AB1203,103Section 10. 16.75 (12) (b) 6. of the statutes is created to read:AB1203,5,5416.75 (12) (b) 6. That the carbon-free percentage for total annual electric 5energy by January 1, 2045, is at least 90 percent.AB1203,116Section 11. 16.75 (12) (b) 7. of the statutes is created to read:AB1203,5,8716.75 (12) (b) 7. That the carbon-free percentage for total annual electric 8energy by January 1, 2050, is at least 100 percent.AB1203,129Section 12. 16.75 (12) (c) 2. of the statutes is amended to read:AB1203,5,141016.75 (12) (c) 2. For any individual agency facility, consider only electric 11energy that is purchased from the electric provider that serves the agency facility 12under an arrangement with a term of 10 years or more and electric energy derived 13from renewable carbon-free resources owned by the state and produced for use in 14the agency facility.AB1203,1315Section 13. 16.75 (12) (d) of the statutes is amended to read:AB1203,5,191616.75 (12) (d) Notwithstanding par. (b), an agency is not required to generate 17or purchase electric energy derived from renewable resources, as defined in s. 16.75 18(12) (a) 4., 2023 stats., if the generation or purchase is not technically feasible or 19cost-effective. Beginning on January 1, 2030, this paragraph does not apply.AB1203,1420Section 14. 16.951 of the statutes is created to read:AB1203,6,22116.951 Economy-wide decarbonization planning. The secretary shall 22direct the office of sustainability and clean energy to establish, using rigorous 23sector-based modeling, an economy-wide decarbonization roadmap that 1incorporates, as appropriate, the state’s clean energy plan issued in 2022. The 2roadmap shall be updated periodically.AB1203,153Section 15. 20.155 (1) (a) of the statutes is created to read:AB1203,6,5420.155 (1) (a) Carbon-free and renewable resource administration. A sum 5sufficient for technology necessary to implement 2025 Wisconsin Act .... (this act).AB1203,166Section 16. 66.0627 (1) (bk) 2. of the statutes is amended to read:AB1203,6,9766.0627 (1) (bk) 2. An improvement to a premises that allows for the small 8scale derivation of electricity from a renewable resource listed under s. 196.378 (1) 9(h), 2023 stats.AB1203,1710Section 17. 70.111 (18) of the statutes is amended to read: Down Down /2025/related/proposals/ab1203 true proposaltext /2025/related/proposals/ab1203 proposaltext/2025/REG/AB1203 proposaltext/2025/REG/AB1203 section true Menu»2025»Related Documents»Proposal Text»AB1203: Bill Text × Details for PDF view Link (Permanent link) Bookmark this location View toggle Go to top of document Search in this chapter Search in this section Search in this agency Search in this chapter group Search in this chapter Search in this section Cross references for section Acts affecting this section References to this 1970 Statutes Annotations Appellate Court Citations Administrative Code Index Reference lines Clear highlighting